Colorado statutes. TITLE 44 Revenue - Regulation of Activities
PART 9 UNLAWFUL ACTS - ENFORCEMENT
44-3-904. Violations - penalties.

Except as provided in subsections (2), (3), and (4) of this section, any person violating any of the provisions of this article 3 or article 4 or 5 of this title 44 or any of the rules authorized and adopted pursuant to such articles commits a civil infraction.

The penalties provided in this section shall not be affected by the penalties provided in any other section of this article 3 or article 4 or 5 of this title 44 but shall be construed to be in addition to any other penalties.

Any person violating any of the provisions of section 44-3-901 (1)(a), (1)(g), (1)(h), (1)(j), (1)(l), (1)(m), (6)(a)(I), or (6)(b) or section 44-3-903 commits a class 2 misdemeanor and shall be punished as provided in section 18-1.3-501.

A person violating the provisions of section 44-3-901 (1)(b) commits a class 2 misdemeanor and shall be punished as provided in section 18-1.3-501.

Any person violating any of the provisions of section 44-3-901 (1)(c) or (1)(d) commits a class 2 misdemeanor and shall be punished as provided in section 18-1.3-501. For the second conviction and for all subsequent convictions of violating the provisions of section 44-3-901 (1)(c) or (1)(d), the court shall impose at least the minimum fine and shall have no discretion to suspend any fine so imposed; except that the court may provide for the payment of such fine as provided in subsection (5) of this section.

At the discretion of the court, the fines provided for violations of section 44-3-901 (1)(c) and (1)(d) may be ordered to be paid by public work only at a reasonable hourly rate to be established by the court, who shall designate the time within which the public work is to be completed.

Any person who knowingly violates the provisions of section 44-3-901 (1)(b), (1)(e), or (1)(l) or any person who knowingly induces, aids, or encourages a person under the age of eighteen years to violate the provisions of section 44-3-901 (1)(b), (1)(c), or (1)(d) may be proceeded against pursuant to section 18-6-701 for contributing to the delinquency of a minor.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 18-1025), ch. 152, p. 1061, § 2, effective October 1.

L. 2021:

(1)(a) and (3) amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3327, § 784, effective March 1, 2022.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-47-903 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-3-905. Duties of inspectors and police officers.

The inspectors of the liquor enforcement division and their supervisors, while actually engaged in performing their duties and while acting under proper orders or regulations, shall have and exercise all the powers vested in peace officers of this state. In the exercise of their duties, the inspectors and their supervisors shall have the power to arrest. The inspectors and their supervisors shall also have the authority to issue summonses for violations of the provisions of this article 3 and articles 4 and 5 of this title 44.

It is the duty of all sheriffs and police officers to enforce the provisions of this article 3 and articles 4 and 5 of this title 44 and the rules made pursuant to said articles and to arrest and complain against any person violating any of the provisions of this article 3 or rules pertaining thereto. It is the duty of the district attorney of the respective judicial districts of this state to prosecute all violations of said articles in the manner and form as is now provided by law for the prosecution of crimes and misdemeanors, and it is a violation of said articles for any such person, knowingly, to fail to perform any duties pursuant to this section.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 18-1025), ch. 152, p. 1062, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-47-904 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-3-906. Warrants - searches and seizures.

If any person makes an affidavit before the judge of any county or district court stating that he or she has reason to and does believe that alcohol beverages are being sold, bartered, exchanged, divided, or unlawfully given away, or kept for such purposes, or carried in violation of this article 3 and article 4 of this title 44 within the jurisdiction of such court, and describing in the affidavit the premises, wagon, automobile, truck, vehicle, contrivance, thing, or device to be searched, the judge of the court shall issue a warrant to any officer, which the complainant may designate, having power to serve original process commanding the officer to search the premises (other than a home), wagon, automobile, truck, vehicle, contrivance, thing, or device described in the affidavit.

The warrant shall be substantially as follows:

The officer charged with the execution of the warrant, when necessary to obtain entrance or when entrance has been refused, may break open any premises (other than a home), wagon, automobile, truck, vehicle, contrivance, thing, or device that by said warrant the officer is directed to search and may execute said warrant any hour of the day or night.

STATE OF COLORADO
)
)
ss.
County of.................................................)
The People of the State of Colorado to..........................................................
Greeting:
Whereas, there has been filed with the undersigned an affidavit of which the following is a copy:

(Here copy of affidavit)

Therefore you are hereby commanded, in the name of the people of the State of Colorado, forthwith, together with the necessary and proper assistance to enter into ....................
....................

(Here describe place mentioned in the affidavit)

of the said ........ situated in the county of ........ aforesaid and there diligently search for the said alcohol beverages and that you bring the same or any part thereof found in such search, together with such vessels in which such beverages are found and the implements and furniture used in connection therewith, and the wagon, automobile, truck, vehicle, contrivance, thing, or device in which carried, forthwith before me, to be disposed of and dealt with according to law.
Given under my hand and seal this ........ day of ........, ...... ............................................
Judge of the ................ Court

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 18-1025), ch. 152, p. 1063, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-47-905 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-3-907. Return on warrant - sale of liquor seized.

If any alcohol beverages are there found, said officer shall seize the same and the vessels in which they are contained and all implements and furniture used or kept in connection with such beverages in the illegal selling, bartering, exchanging, giving away, or carrying of same, and any wagon, automobile, truck, vehicle, contrivance, thing, or device used in conveying the same, and safely keep them and make immediate return on the warrant. The property shall not be taken from the custody of any officer seizing or holding the same by writ of replevin or other process while the proceedings relating thereto are pending.

Final judgment of conviction in such proceedings shall be a bar to any suit for the recovery of any property so seized or the value of same or for damages alleged to arise by reason of the seizure and detention. The judgment entered shall find said alcohol beverages to be unlawful and shall direct their destruction or sale forthwith, in the manner provided by subsection (7) of this section. The wagon, automobile, truck, vehicle, contrivance, thing, or device, vessels, implements, and furniture shall likewise be ordered disposed of in the same manner as personal property is sold under execution, and the proceeds therefrom applied, first in the payment of the cost of the prosecution and of any fine imposed, and the balance, if any, paid into the general school fund of the county in which the conviction is had.

The officer serving the warrant shall forthwith proceed in the manner required for the institution of a criminal action in the court issuing the warrant, charging a violation of law as the evidence in the case justifies. If the officer refuses or neglects to so proceed as specified, then the person filing the affidavit for the search warrant, or any other person, may so proceed.

If, during the trial of a person charged with a violation of this article 3, the evidence presented discloses that fluids were poured out, or otherwise destroyed, manifestly for the purpose of preventing seizure, said fluids shall be held to be prima facie alcohol beverages and intended for unlawful use, sale, barter, exchange, or gift.

If no person is in possession of the premises where illegal alcohol beverages are found, the officer seizing the alcohol beverages shall post in a conspicuous place on said premises a copy of the warrant, and if at the time fixed for any hearing concerning the alcohol beverages seized, or within thirty days thereafter, no person appears, the court in which the hearing was to be held shall order the alcohol beverages destroyed or sold in the manner provided in subsection (7) of this section.

No warrant issued pursuant to this article 3 shall authorize the search of any place where a person may lawfully keep alcohol beverages as provided in this article 3. No warrant shall be issued to search a home occupied as such, as provided in this section, unless it or some part of it is used in connection with or as a store, shop, hotel, boardinghouse, rooming house, or place of public resort.

Any sale of alcohol beverages conducted upon order of court pursuant to this section shall be conducted in the following manner:

The officer ordered by the court to conduct the sale shall give notice of the time and place of the sale by posting a notice in a prominent place in the county for a period of five consecutive days prior to the day of the sale. The notice shall describe as fully as possible the property to be sold and shall state the time and place of the sale.

The sale shall be conducted as a public auction in some suitable public place on the specified day at some time between the hours of 9 a.m. and 5 p.m., and the time chosen for the sale shall be indicated in the notice.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 18-1025), ch. 152, p. 1064, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-47-906 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-3-908. Loss of property rights.

There shall be no property rights of any kind in any alcohol beverages, vessels, appliances, fixtures, bars, furniture, implements, wagons, automobiles, trucks, vehicles, contrivances, or any other things or devices used in or kept for the purpose of violating any of the provisions of this article 3 or article 4 of this title 44.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 18-1025), ch. 152, p. 1065, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-47-907 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-3-909. Colorado state fair - common consumption area - national western center - consumption on premises.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this article 3, a person who purchases an alcohol beverage for consumption from a vendor licensed under this article 3 that is either attached to a common consumption area or licensed for the fairgrounds of the Colorado state fair authority may leave the licensed premises with the alcohol beverage and possess and consume the alcohol beverage at any place within the common consumption area or fairgrounds if the person does not remove the alcohol beverage from the common consumption area or fairgrounds. This subsection (1) does not authorize a person to bring into the common consumption area or fairgrounds an alcohol beverage purchased outside of the common consumption area or fairgrounds.

When and where specifically authorized by an ordinance adopted by the city and county of Denver and notwithstanding any other provision of this article 3, a person who purchases an alcohol beverage for consumption from a vendor licensed under this article 3 for the national western center may leave the licensed premises with the alcohol beverage and possess and consume the alcohol beverage at any place within the national western center if the person does not remove the alcohol beverage from the national western center. This subsection (2) does not authorize a person to bring into the national western center an alcohol beverage purchased outside the national western center.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 18-1025), ch. 152, p. 1065, § 2, effective October 1.

L. 2019:

Entire section amended, (SB 19-200), ch. 307, p. 2798, § 2, effective August 2.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-47-908 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-3-910. Common consumption areas.

A promotional association or attached licensed premises shall not:

Employ a person to serve alcohol beverages or provide security within the common consumption area unless the server has completed the server and seller training program established by the director of the liquor enforcement division of the department;

Sell or provide an alcohol beverage to a customer for consumption within the common consumption area but not within the licensed premises in a container that is larger than sixteen ounces;

Sell or provide an alcohol beverage to a customer for consumption within the common consumption area but not within the licensed premises unless the container is disposable and contains the name of the vendor in at least twenty-four-point font;

Permit customers to leave the licensed premises with an alcohol beverage unless the beverage container complies with subsections (1)(b) and (1)(c) of this section;

Operate the common consumption area during hours the licensed premises cannot sell alcohol under this article 3 or the limitations imposed by the local licensing authority;

Operate the common consumption area in an area that exceeds the maximum authorized by this article 3 or by the local licensing authority;

Sell, serve, dispose of, exchange, or deliver, or permit the sale, serving, giving, or procuring of, an alcohol beverage to a visibly intoxicated person or to a known habitual drunkard;

Sell, serve, dispose of, exchange, or deliver, or permit the sale, serving, or giving of an alcohol beverage to a person under twenty-one years of age; or

Permit a visibly intoxicated person to loiter within the common consumption area.

The promotional association shall promptly remove all alcohol beverages from the common consumption area at the end of the hours of operation.

A person shall not consume an alcohol beverage within the common consumption area unless it was purchased from an attached, licensed premises.

This section does not apply to a special event permit issued under article 5 of this title 44 or the holder thereof unless the permit holder desires to use an existing common consumption area and agrees in writing to the requirements of this article 3 and the local licensing authority concerning the common consumption area.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 18-1025), ch. 152, p. 1065, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-47-909 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-3-911. Takeout and delivery of alcohol beverages - permit - on-premises consumption licenses - requirements and limitations - rules - definition - repeal.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this article 3 or article 4 of this title 44 and subject to subsections (2) and (3) of this section:

Between the hours of 7 a.m. and 12 midnight, a licensee may sell and deliver an alcohol beverage to a customer for consumption off the licensed premises; and

If an alcohol beverage is part of a takeout order for consumption off the licensed premises:

A customer may remove the alcohol beverage from the licensed premises if the alcohol beverage is in a sealed container that complies with the rules of the state licensing authority; and

The licensee may allow a customer to remove the alcohol beverage from the licensed premises.

Subject to subsections (2) and (3) of this section, a licensee may sell or deliver alcohol beverages under this section by the drink.

To sell and deliver an alcohol beverage or to allow a customer to remove an alcohol beverage from the licensed premises as either is authorized under subsection (1) of this section, the licensee must:

Have any applicable permits issued under this section to sell alcohol beverages for takeout or delivery; except that this subsection (2)(a) does not apply if the governor has declared a disaster emergency under part 7 of article 33.5 of title 24;

Sell or deliver:

The alcohol beverage only to a customer who is twenty-one years of age or older;

The alcohol beverage in a sealed container that complies with the rules of the state licensing authority; and

No more than the following amounts of alcohol beverages per delivery or takeout order unless the governor has declared a disaster emergency under part 7 of article 33.5 of title 24:

One thousand five hundred milliliters, approximately 50.8 fluid ounces, of vinous liquors;

One hundred forty-four fluid ounces, approximately four thousand two hundred fifty-nine milliliters, of malt liquors, fermented malt beverages, and hard cider; and

One liter, approximately 33.8 fluid ounces, of spirituous liquors.

Derive no more than fifty percent of its gross annual revenues from total sales of food and alcohol beverages from the sale of alcohol beverages through takeout orders and that the licensee delivers; except that:

This subsection (2)(c) does not apply if the governor has declared a disaster emergency under part 7 of article 33.5 of title 24; or

This subsection (2)(c) does not apply to a sales room at a premises licensed under section 44-3-402 or 44-3-407; and

If an alcohol beverage is being delivered, use a delivery person who complies with subsection (3) of this section.

To deliver an alcohol beverage under this section, the delivery person must:

Deliver the alcohol beverage to a place that is not licensed under this article 3 or article 4 of this title 44;

Be an employee of the licensee who is twenty-one years of age or older;

Deliver an alcohol beverage only to a person who is twenty-one years of age or older; and

Have satisfactorily completed the server and seller training program established under section 44-3-1002.

The state licensing authority shall promulgate rules:

Specifying the types of containers that may be used for takeout or delivery of an alcohol beverage under this section;

Creating a permit for takeout and delivery of alcohol beverages;

Setting fees for the processing and approval of a takeout or delivery permit application; and

Concerning any other matter necessary for the safe and effective implementation of this section.

The state licensing authority shall issue a permit to a licensee to sell alcohol beverages for takeout and delivery if the licensee demonstrates the ability to comply with this section. A permit issued under this subsection (4)(b) is subject to the suspension and revocation provisions set forth in section 44-3-601.

The local licensing authority may create a permit for takeout and delivery of alcohol beverages to implement this section. If a local licensing authority does not create a permit under this subsection (4)(c), a licensee need not obtain a local permit to sell and deliver an alcohol beverage or to allow a customer to remove an alcohol beverage from the licensed premises.

A local licensing authority may establish fees for the processing and approval of a takeout or delivery permit application, but the amount of the fee must not exceed the amount of the fee set by the state licensing authority under subsection (4)(a)(III) of this section.

If a local licensing authority creates a takeout or delivery permit:

The licensee must obtain the permit to sell and deliver an alcohol beverage or to allow a customer to remove an alcohol beverage from the licensed premises as either is authorized under subsection (1) of this section; and

The local licensing authority shall issue a permit to a licensee to sell alcohol beverages for takeout and delivery if the licensee demonstrates the ability to comply with this section.

A permit issued under this subsection (4)(c) is subject to the suspension and revocation provisions set forth in section 44-3-601.

A manufacturer licensed under section 44-3-402 that operates a sales room or a wholesaler licensed under section 44-3-407 that operates a sales room need not obtain a permit from the local licensing authority to sell and deliver an alcohol beverage or to allow a customer to remove an alcohol beverage from the licensed premises.

The licensee shall submit an application for a permit issued under this section to the state licensing authority and the local licensing authority, if applicable, simultaneously. Approval by either the state licensing authority or a local licensing authority does not guarantee approval by the other licensing authority.

For the purposes of this article 3 and article 4 of this title 44, an alcohol beverage that is sold and delivered to a customer's home for consumption off the licensed premises under this section is sold at the licensed premises.

This section authorizes a license holder that is issued a license under one of the following sections to sell an alcohol beverage to a customer for consumption off of the licensed premises: Section 44-3-402 that operates a sales room or section 44-3-407 that operates a sales room or section 44-3-411, 44-3-413, 44-3-414, 44-3-417, 44-3-418, 44-3-422, 44-3-426, 44-3-428, 44-4-104 (1)(c)(I)(A), or 44-4-104 (1)(c)(III).
(6) (a) (I) This section authorizes a license holder that is issued a license under one of the following sections to sell an alcohol beverage to a customer for consumption off of the licensed premises: Section 44-3-402 that operates a sales room or section 44-3-407 that operates a sales room or section 44-3-411, 44-3-413, 44-3-414, 44-3-417, 44-3-418, 44-3-422, 44-3-426, 44-3-428, 44-4-104 (1)(c)(I)(A), or 44-4-104 (1)(c)(III).

This section authorizes a license holder that is issued a license under one of the following sections to deliver an alcohol beverage to a customer for consumption off of the licensed premises: Section 44-3-411, 44-3-412, 44-3-413, 44-3-414, 44-3-415, 44-3-416, 44-3-417, 44-3-418, 44-3-419, 44-3-420, 44-3-421, 44-3-422, 44-3-426, or 44-3-428.

Repealed.

This section does not apply to a person issued a license or permit that is not listed in subsection (6)(a) of this section or to a caterer who is licensed to sell alcohol beverages.

Subsection (2)(b)(III) of this section does not apply to:

A manufacturer licensed under section 44-3-402 that operates a sales room or a wholesaler licensed under section 44-3-407 that operates a sales room; and

The sale of an alcohol beverage manufactured by the licensee and sold by a brew pub licensed under section 44-3-417, a vintner's restaurant licensed under section 44-3-422, or a distillery pub licensed under section 44-3-426.

This section is repealed, effective July 1, 2025.

Source:

L. 2020:

Entire section added, (SB 20-213), ch. 262, p. 1260, § 1, effective July 10.

L. 2021:

(1)(a)(I), (2)(b)(III), (6)(a), and (7) amended, (HB 21-1027), ch. 290, p. 1713, § 1, effective June 22; (4)(b) amended, (SB 21-266), ch. 423, p. 2809, § 46, effective July 2.

Editor's note:

Subsection (6)(a)(III) provided for the repeal of subsection (6)(a)(III), effective January 2, 2022. (See L. 2021, p. 1713.)

44-3-912. Communal outdoor dining areas - permit required - rules.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this article 3 or article 4 of this title 44 and subject to the approval of the state and local licensing authorities, a communal outdoor dining area may be shared by two or more persons licensed for on-premises consumption, including an approved sales room, under this article 3 or article 4 of this title 44.

A licensee shall not sell or serve alcohol beverages in a communal outdoor dining area unless:

The licensee obtains a permit from the state licensing authority and pays the permitting fee established by rule; and

The state and local licensing authorities have first approved:

Attaching the license to the communal outdoor dining area; and

A modification of the licensed premises of each attached licensee to include the communal outdoor dining area.

This section does not apply to a special event permit issued under article 5 of this title 44 or the holder of the permit unless the permit holder holds a special event at an existing communal outdoor dining area and agrees in writing to the requirements of this article 3 for and the local licensing authority for the communal outdoor dining area.

To be approved, a communal outdoor dining area must be within one thousand feet of the permanent licensed premises of each of the licenses attached to the communal outdoor dining area. This distance must be computed by direct measurement, using a route of direct pedestrian access, from the nearest property line of the land used for the communal outdoor dining area to the nearest portion of the building where the permanent licensed premises is located.

If a violation of this article 3 or article 4 of this title 44 occurs within a communal outdoor dining area and the licensee responsible for the violation can be identified, that licensee is subject to discipline as set forth in section 44-3-601. If the licensee responsible for the violation cannot be identified, each attached licensee is deemed jointly responsible and subject to discipline for the violation.

The state licensing authority shall promulgate rules governing communal outdoor dining areas, including rules governing:

Applications;

Modification of the licensed premises to include a communal outdoor dining area;

Supervision and control of the communal outdoor dining area by the attached licensees;

Submission to and approval of security and control plans by the state and local licensing authorities;

Removal of alcohol beverages from the communal outdoor dining area;

Special events held within a communal outdoor dining area; and

Insurance requirements.

Source:

L. 2021:

Entire section added, (HB 21-1027), ch. 290, p. 1715, § 3, effective June 22.